Alabama, session 2026rs, HB546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-40-233.75, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-40-233.75
(a) All amounts collected and deposited in the Lawrence
County Community Corrections and Court Services Fund shall be
expended for the implementation of this subpart, including,
but not limited to: (i) paying salaries and other expenses
involved in conducting investigations and studies necessary to
determine whether particular defendants will be granted the
benefits of this subpart; (ii) administration required to
carry out this subpart; (iii) transportation of defendants to
and from their places of employment; (iv) matching any federal
Page 1

and from their places of employment; (iv) matching any federal
HB546 Enrolled
and state grants that may be available in relation to the
purposes of this subpart; and (v) implementation and
administration of the treatment, rehabilitation, education,
intervention, and pretrial diversion programs created pursuant
to Section 45-40-233.79 as determined to be required by law or
consistent with the purposes of this subpart.
(b) If at the end of any calendarfiscal year there is a
surplus in the Lawrence County Community Corrections and Court
Services Fund, the surplus shall be paid to the General Fund
of Lawrence County if a majority of the commission members, by
affirmative vote, decide at a duly convened meeting of the
commission that the surplus, or any portion thereof, is in
excess of an amount necessary to carry out this subpart.
Section 2. Section 45-40-233.77, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-40-233.77
(a) AnyExcept as provided in subsection (b), any
individual in Lawrence County charged with a non-capital,
bailable offense, as a matter of right, mayshall be released
pending trial on his or her personal recognizance or upon the
execution of an appearance bond. However, if
(b) If a judge having jurisdiction determines that a
release will not reasonably assure the defendant's appearance
as required or that a defendant's being at-large will pose a
real and present danger to the public, the judge, either in
lieu of or in addition to the methods and conditions of
release specified in Rules 7.2(a) and 7.3 of the Alabama Rules
of Criminal Procedure, may:
Page 2

of Criminal Procedure, may:
HB546 Enrolled
(1) Require the defendant to execute an appearance bond
in a specified amount with 10 percent of the amount to be
deposited with the clerk of the court, in cash or other
security as directed, and 10 percentwithin 30 days of the
deposit, the clerk shall remit 10 percent of the deposit shall
be remitted within 10 days after the deposit to the Lawrence
County Commission for depositdistribution to the fund
established by Section 45-40-233.73, and thatshall return the
remainder of the deposit shall be returned by the clerk to the
defendant after he or she is discharged upon dismissal of the
pending charges or the imposition of sentence after
conviction; or
(2) Impose any additional condition deemed reasonably
necessary to assure appearance as required, including a
condition requiring the defendant return to custody after
specified hours.
(b)(c) In determining which methods and conditions of
release will reasonably assure the appearance of a defendant
as required or will protect certain individuals or the general
public from a defendant who poses a real and present danger,
the judge or magistrate, in addition to considering the
principles and guidelines set forth in Rules 7.2(a) and 7.3 of
the Alabama Rules of Criminal Procedure, shall bear in mind
that the purposes of this subpart are not only to assure the
presence of the defendant at trial, but also to assure that
all defendants, regardless of financial or social status,
shall not needlessly be detained pending appearance to answer
charges, or pending appeal, when detention serves neither the
Page 3

charges, or pending appeal, when detention serves neither the
HB546 Enrolled
ends of justice nor the public interest.
(c)(d) All amounts collected under this section shall
be paid into the Lawrence County Community Corrections and
Court Services Fund, unless payment is otherwise directed by
general law.
Section 3. Section 45-40-233.81, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-40-233.81
(a) Any municipality in Lawrence County may elect to
participate in the programs authorized by this subpart. The
election shall be evidenced by a resolution adopted by the
governing body of the municipality by which the municipality
agrees to participate in the programs authorized by this
subpart and to contribute any revenue arising from work
release programs authorized by this subpart to the Lawrence
100 County Community Corrections and Court Services Fund.
101 (b) A certified copy of the resolution shall be sent to
102 the Lawrence County Community Corrections and Court Services
103 Commission and the.
104 (c) The election shall be effective on the first day of
105 the calendarfiscal quarter next following delivery of the
106 resolution to the commission.
107 Section 4. Act 1979-736, 1979 Regular Session (Acts
108 1979, p. 1307), now appearing as Subpart 3, Part 4, Article
109 23, Chapter 40 of Title 45, Code of Alabama 1975, and
110 establishing a rehabilitation board and a work release
111 program, is repealed.
112 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
Page 4

Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
HB546 Enrolled
113 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
HB546 Enrolled
114
115
116
117
118
119
120
121
122
123
124 ________________________________________________
125 Speaker of the House of Representatives
126
127
128
129 ________________________________________________
130 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
131
132
133 House of Representatives
134
135 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
136 was passed by the House 10-Mar-26.
137
138 John Treadwell
139 Clerk
140
141
142
143
144
145 Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed
146
147
148
Page 6